src-fst-morphology-stems-nob-abbreviations.lexc.md
# File containing abbreviations for Norwegian Bokmål 

This file documents the Bokmål abbrevioations stem file [stems/nob-abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/nob-abbreviations.lexc).

Abbreviation-nob 

##            Intransitive abbreviations           

These give clause boundaries before capital letters
and numbers, but not elsewhere.

---------------------------------------------
Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.

ITRAB 

Transitive number-related abbreviations      !

These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.

--------------------------------------------------
Gården har Gnr. 10.
Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.
--------------------------------------------------

TRNUMAB 

#              Transitive abbreviations           

TRAB 

dot% noStb.db
Abbreviations that never induce sentence boundaries
The file is too large and should be shrinked

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nob-abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nob-abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
